Utah statutes.
73-10f-2.   Bear River feasibility studies.
(1)  The division is directed to undertake a study of the feasibility of
developing the Bear River.  This study shall include the following components:
(a)  an assessment of present water supplies, uses, and rights and future
water needs in counties within the Bear River Basin and along the Wasatch
Front;
(b)  an evaluation of alternative dam and reservoir sites;
(c)  a review of preliminary design work;
(d)  an update of the cost estimates;
(e)  an assessment of environmental impacts;
(f)  water quality analyses; and
(g)  financial and economic analyses.
(2)  The division shall:
(a)  report to the task force on the progress of the studies upon the request
of the chairmen; and
(b)  report its interim conclusions and recommendations to the task force by
October 31, 1990, and its final conclusions and recommendations by October 31,
1991.
